Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-2701
Act, how cited.

Sections 13-2701 to 13-2710 shall be known and may be cited
as the Civic and Community Center Financing Act.

Laws 1999, LB 382, § 13;

Laws 2011, LB297, § 2;

Laws 2013, LB153, § 1.